Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.910

Construction—Chapter as cumulative and nonexclusive.

Except as specifically provided in RCW 19.105.510, the provisions of this chapter are cumulative and nonexclusive and do not affect any other remedy available at law.

[ 1982 c 69 s 23.]